North Carolina, session 2025, HB1172.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The Ciji Graham Act."

PART II. HIGH-RISK PREGNANCY CARE NAVIGATION PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two million three hundred
thousand dollars ($2,300,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
establish a uniform High-Risk Pregnancy Care Navigation Program (the program) in each of the
six North Carolina Medicaid managed care regions to support the use of licensed nurses as care
navigators to assist individuals experiencing high-risk pregnancies with accessing timely,
equitable, and clinically appropriate care. These funds shall be allocated and used as follows:
(1) One million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) to establish 12
full-time, permanent Nurse Consultant positions within the Department of
*H1172-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, to be distributed
equally among the six North Carolina Medicaid managed care regions. Each
Nurse Consultant position funded by this section shall be dedicated to
performing the following duties within the program, either in person or
through the use of telehealth services, defined as the use of two-way, real-time
interactive audio and video where the nurse consultant and the pregnant
patient can hear and see each other:
a. Assisting patients in understanding diagnoses associated with
high-risk pregnancy conditions.
b. Coordinating timely referrals to appropriate providers, including (i)
maternal-fetal medicine specialists and high-risk obstetricians, (ii)
hospital systems equipped for high-risk labor and delivery, and (iii)
providers offering pregnancy termination services, when clinically
indicated and consistent with patient choice and State law.
c. Providing culturally competent, patient-centered guidance that
respects patient autonomy and informed decision making.
d. Addressing barriers to care, including transportation, insurance
enrollment, appointment scheduling, and continuity of care.
(2) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to cover the cost of program administration
and to purchase equipment, high-speed internet access, and any other
infrastructure necessary to establish telehealth services. The Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, may use up to one
percent (1%) of these funds for administrative purposes related to the
program.
SECTION 2.1.(b) Annually by September 1, beginning September 1, 2028, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division on the establishment and operation of the High-Risk Pregnancy Care Navigation
Program authorized and funded by subsection (a) of this section. The report shall include at least
all of the following:
(1) An itemized list of program expenditures.
(2) A description of the care navigation services provided under the program,
including the utilization frequency of these services.
(3) An evaluation of the timeliness of referrals provided under the program and
the impact on patient access to care.
(4) An evaluation of the impact of the program on maternal and infant health
outcomes associated with high-risk pregnancies.
(5) Any obstacles to effective program operation and recommendations for
program improvement.

PART III. PREGNANCY CONSULTATION HOTLINE
SECTION 3.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of seven million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($7,700,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year
to establish a statewide hotline that provides free, real-time telephone consultation to healthcare
providers serving pregnant patients and community-based organizations focused on caring for
pregnant women. The hotline shall be staffed Monday through Friday from 8:00 A.M. to 5:00
P.M. with qualified healthcare providers capable of doing all of the following:
(1) Providing rapid access to clinical guidance from qualified specialists,
including maternal-fetal medicine specialists.
(2) Offering immediate case-specific clinical guidance.
Page 2 House Bill 1172-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Supporting urgent and emergent decision making.
(4) Providing referrals to all of the following:
a. North Carolina's Pregnancy Medical Home Program.
b. Maternal health services.
c. Nutritional assistance programs, including the Women, Infants, and
Children (WIC) Program and the Food and Nutrition Services
Program.
d. Community-based organizations that can serve as a resource to both
healthcare providers and pregnant patients.
SECTION 3.1.(b) No later than September 1, 2027, and September 1, 2028, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall submit to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division the following information regarding the hotline established pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section:
(1) The number of consultations provided over the previous fiscal year.
(2) The geographic regions of the State utilizing the services offered by the
hotline.
(3) The percentage of hotline consultations that resulted in referral to a
maternal-fetal medicine specialist.
(4) The estimated number of avoided emergency department visits resulting from
the services provided through the hotline.
(5) Any other information the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Public Health, deems relevant to successful operation of the
hotline.

PART IV. CENTRALIZED CLINICAL INFORMATION HUB FOR MANAGING
HIGH-RISK PREGNANCIES
SECTION 4.1. The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and
maintain a centralized, evidence-based digital information hub for clinicians managing patients
with high-risk pregnancies that includes all of the following:
(1) Up-to-date clinical guidelines for managing high-risk pregnancy conditions.
(2) A real-time, regionally organized directory of:
a. Maternal-fetal medicine specialists.
b. High-risk obstetric providers.
c. Facilities equipped for complex pregnancy care.
d. Providers of abortion care services, to the extent permitted by State
law.
(3) Standardized referral protocols to support timely and appropriate care
transitions.
(4) Decision-support tools to assist clinicians in counseling and referral for
patients with complex or life-threatening conditions during pregnancy.

PART V. STANDARDIZED REFERRAL PATHWAYS FOR HIGH-RISK
PREGNANCIES
SECTION 5.1. The Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with
relevant stakeholders, shall establish uniform referral pathways to ensure that patients diagnosed
with high-risk pregnancy conditions are offered either of the following:
(1) For those seeking to continue their pregnancies, immediate referral to
appropriate high-risk obstetric or maternal-fetal medicine care.
House Bill 1172-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) For those electing not to continue their pregnancies or when termination of
pregnancy is medically indicated, timely referral to qualified providers for
pregnancy termination services to the extent permitted by State law.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 4 House Bill 1172-First Edition